Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1776
Overpayment due to clerical error or mistake; return by political subdivision; how treated.

Any political subdivision which has received proceeds from a levy imposed on all taxable property within an entire county which is in excess of that requested by the political subdivision under section 77-1632 as a result of a clerical error or mistake shall, in the fiscal year following receipt, return the excess tax collections, net of the collection fee, to the county. By July 31 of the fiscal year following the receipt of any excess tax collections, the county treasurer shall certify to the political subdivision the amount to be returned. For fiscal years beginning prior to July 1, 2025, such excess tax collections shall be restricted funds in the budget of the county that receives the funds under section 13-518.

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB644, § 21;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 23;

Laws 2026, LB803, § 19.
January 1, 2027